Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Counties. (a) A county board may issue an annual on-sale intoxicating liquor license within the area of the county that is unorganized or unincorporated to a bowling center, restaurant, club, hotel, or resort as defined in section 157.15, subdivision 11, with the approval of the commissioner. (b) A county board may also with the approval of the commissioner issue deleted text begin up to tendeleted text end seasonal on-sale licenses to restaurants deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end clubsnew text begin , and resorts as defined in section 157.15, subdivision 11,new text end for the sale of intoxicating liquor within the area of the county that is unorganized or unincorporated. Notwithstanding section 340A.412, subdivision 8, a seasonal license is valid for a period specified by the board, not to exceed nine months. Not more than one license may be issued for any one premises during any consecutive 12-month period. (c) A county board may issue an annual on-sale malt liquor license to a resort as defined in section 157.15, subdivision 11, within the area of the county that is unorganized or unincorporated, notwithstanding any law or local ordinance. A license issued under this paragraph authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons staying at the resort and their guests.